Louisiana, session 2026, HB24.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:710.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§710.3. Annual independent contractors
A. As used in this Section, the following words and phrases shall have the
following meanings, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context:
(1)(a) "Independent contract" means a written contract that meets the
requirements of this Paragraph.
(b) The term of the contract shall not exceed one fiscal year.
(c) The contract shall expressly state each of the following:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-259 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 24
(i) The independent contractor is not an employee of the school board for
any purpose.
(ii) The independent contractor is responsible for contributing all federal and
state income tax withholdings, Social Security, Medicare, and unemployment
insurance.
(iii) The independent contractor is ineligible for any health insurance, sick
leave, sabbatical leave, tenure, or any other employee benefit provided to school
board employees.
(iv) The independent contractor is compensated by an Internal Revenue
Service Form 1099-NEC or successor form.
(2) "Independent contractor" means an individual who holds a valid
Louisiana teaching certificate or who has been issued a provisional teaching permit
or an authorization to teach by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education pursuant to R.S. 17:8.2(B)(2) and who enters into an independent contract
with a school board to act as a teacher, an administrator, a substitute teacher, a para-
professional or in any capacity deemed necessary by the school board.
(3) "School Board" means a city, parish, or other local school board.
B.(1) For each independent contractor contracted pursuant to this Section,
the school board shall remit to the Teachers' Retirement System of Louisiana the full
employer contribution as provided in R.S. 11:102(D).
(2) The independent contractor shall not make contributions to the system
during the term of the independent contract, and he shall not receive additional
service credit and shall not accrue any additional retirement benefits.
(3) Notwithstanding Subsection C of this Section, any independent
contractor who returns to active service covered by the provisions of this Chapter
within the twelve-month period immediately following the effective date of such
retirement shall have his retirement benefits suspended for the duration of such
active service or the lapse of twelve months from the effective date of his retirement,
whichever occurs first.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-259 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 24
(4) The school board shall not report to the retirement system the name,
social security number, or any other personally identifiable information of any
independent contractor. The school board shall report to the retirement system only
the total gross compensation paid under all independent contracts authorized by this
Section and the total employer contributions remitted.
C.(1) An independent contractor contracted pursuant to the provisions of this
Section shall be exempt from any increase, suspension, or reduction of benefits
received from this system as a result of reemployment.
(2) Notwithstanding R.S. 11:710, 710.1, or 710.2, an independent contractor
contracted pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall not be subject to any
earnings limitation.
D. The school board shall notify the Department of Education within thirty
days of entering into any independent contract pursuant to this Section and provide
the number of independent contracts executed and subject areas or grade levels
filled.
E. The provisions of this Section shall terminate on June 30, 2029. Any
independent contract in effect on June 30, 2029, may be completed according to its
terms.
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.